src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Karelian Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The verb lexicon contains two groups of continuation lexica
!! One, with names like VERB_KUUL/UO (in capital letters and indicating stem)
!! have analyses like the Finnish fst (without twolc). The other group has
!! contlexes with nams *verb, verb_frekv, verb_intr*, etc. They have
!! analyses more like the Kven and Meänkieli ones (with gradation and
!! harmony as twolc processes.

!! **TODO:** Clean up this and go for one of the two.

!! ## Intermediate lexica, for now pointing to present tense only.

LEXICON verb
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_deskr
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_fakt
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_fakt.kaus
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
!! ... etc. some 20 similar lexica.
LEXICON verb_frekv
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_frekv.-refl
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_inkoat
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_intr
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_kaus
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_kontin
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_mod
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_mom
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_mom.-refl.mom
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_pass
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_pass.refl
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_pass.yksipers
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_refl
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_tr
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_transl
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_vaill
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!
LEXICON verb_yksipers
+V: vinfl ; ! xxx check!


!! ## Morphological lexica

!! ### Lexica pointing to final lexica

LEXICON vinfl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** going to strong (no trigger)  and weak (^WG trigger)
+Act+Ind:^WG verb_weak_pres ; !!≈ @CODE@
+Act+Ind:    verb_strong_pres ; !!≈ @CODE@


!! ### Final lexica (only pointing to K)

LEXICON verb_weak_pres
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Sg1:%>n # ;
+Sg2:%>t # ;
+Pl1:%>mm{aä} # ;
+Pl2:%>tt{aä} # ;

LEXICON verb_strong_pres
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Sg3:%>{uy} # ;

LEXICON verb_3pl_pres
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+V+Pl3+Prs:h # ;

LEXICON VERB_CONNEG_0
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Prs+ConNeg:0 # ;


LEXICON VERB_PAST_3SG_0
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:0 # ;

LEXICON VERB_3SG_0_BACK
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: VERB_CLITS_BACK_OPT ;
!+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Qst:ko # ;

LEXICON VERB_3SG_U
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:u VERB_CLITS_BACK_OPT ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Qst:uko # ;

LEXICON VERB_3SG_Y
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:y VERB_CLITS_FRONT_OPT ;

LEXICON VERB_PASSIVE_H
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:h # ;
+Pss+Prs:h # ;
+Pss+Prs+ConNeg:0 # ;

LEXICON VERB_PASSIVE_H_BACK
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ah # ;
+Pss+Prs:ah # ;
+Pss+Prs+ConNeg:a # ;

LEXICON VERB_PASSIVE_H_FRONT
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:äh # ;
+Pss+Prs:äh # ;
+Pss+Prs+ConNeg:ä # ;

LEXICON VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:h CLITS_KI_OPT ;
+Pss+Past:h CLITS_KI_OPT ;

LEXICON VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_TIH_BACK
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:tih CLITS_KI_OPT ;
+Pss+Past:tih CLITS_KI_OPT ;

LEXICON VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_TIH_FRONT
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:tih CLITS_KI_OPT ;
+Pss+Past:tih CLITS_KI_OPT ;

LEXICON VERB_IMPV_KAH/KA/KUA
 VERB_IMPV_KAH ;
 VERB_IMPVPL1_KA ;
 VERB_IMPVPL2_KUA ;
LEXICON VERB_IMPV_KAH
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Act+Imp+Sg3:kah # ;
+Act+Imp+Pl3:kah # ;

LEXICON VERB_IMPVPL1_KA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Act+Imp+Pl1:ka # ;

LEXICON VERB_IMPVPL2_KUA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Imp+Pl2:kua # ;

LEXICON VERB_IMPV_KÄH/KÄ/KYÄ
 VERB_IMPV_KÄH ;
 VERB_IMPVPL1_KÄ ;
 VERB_IMPVPL2_KYÄ ;
LEXICON VERB_IMPV_KÄH
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Act+Imp+Sg3:käh # ;
+Act+Imp+Pl3:käh # ;

LEXICON VERB_IMPVPL1_KÄ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Imp+Pl1:kä # ;

LEXICON VERB_IMPVPL2_KYÄ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Imp+Pl2:kyä # ;

LEXICON VERB_IMPV
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+Imp+Sg2:0 # ;
+Act+Prs+ConNeg:0 # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_MÄ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Inf+Ill:mäh # ;
+Inf+Ine:mäššä # ;
+Inf+Ade:mällä # ;
+Inf+Abe:mättä # ;
+Der+Der/NomAct+N:mi NOUN_HÄVIEMI/NI ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_MA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Inf+Ill:mah # ;
+Inf+Ine:mašša # ;
+Inf+Abe:matta # ;
+Inf+Ade:malla # ;
+Der+Der/NomAct+N:mi NOUN_ŠIJAHI/NI ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_TA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Inf:ta # ;
+Inf+Tra+PxSg1:takšeni # ;
+Inf+Tra+PxSg2:takšeš # ;!to be attested
+Inf+Tra+Px3:takšeh # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_TÄ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Inf:tä # ;
+Inf+Tra+PxSg1:täkšeni # ;
+Inf+Tra+PxSg2:täkšeš # ;!to be attested
+Inf+Tra+Px3:täkšeh # ;

!! FIXME: not sure
LEXICON VERB_INF_AS
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Ger+Ine:as’s’a # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_A
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Inf:a # ;
+Inf+Tra+PxSg1:akšeni # ;
+Inf+Tra+PxSg2:akšeš # ;
+Inf+Tra+Px3:akšeh # ;

!! FIXME: ger or sup or some other
LEXICON VERB_INF_EN
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Ger:en # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_Ä
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Inf:ä # ;
+Inf+Tra+PxSg1:äkšeni # ;
+Inf+Tra+PxSg2:äkšeš # ;!to be attested
+Inf+Tra+Px3:äkšeh # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_Ö
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Inf:ö # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_O
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Inf:o # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_E
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Inf:e # ;

LEXICON VERB_PCP_TU/TAVA/TAIS/TIH
 VERB_PCP_TU ;
 VERB_PCP_TAVA ;
 VERB_COND_PASSIVE_TAIS ;
 VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_TIH_BACK ;
 VERB_PASSIVE_H_BACK ;
LEXICON VERB_PCP_TY/TÄVÄ/TÄIS/TIH
 VERB_PCP_TY ;
 VERB_PCP_TÄVÄ ;
 VERB_COND_PASSIVE_TÄIS ;
 VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_TIH_FRONT ;
 VERB_PASSIVE_H_FRONT ;
LEXICON VERB_PCP_TU
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Nom:tu # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Par:tuo # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Par+Px3:tuoh # ;

LEXICON VERB_PCP_TY
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Nom:ty # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Par:työ # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Par+Px3:työh # ;

LEXICON VERB_PCP_TAVA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Ela:tavašta # ;!Bible 
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Ess:tavana # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Gen:tavan # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Nom:tava # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Par:tavua # ;!Bible 
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Par+Px3:tavuah # ;!Bible 
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Par+Px3:tuoh # ; ! CHECKME 20250827 jaska
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Tra:tavakši # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Abl:tavilta # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Abl+Px3:taviltah # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Ade:tavilla # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Ade+Px3:tavillah # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Com+Px3:tavineh # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Ela:tavista # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Gen:tavien # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Ill:tavih # ;! CHECKME 20250827 jaska
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Ine:tavissa # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Nom:tavat # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Par:tavie # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Par+Px3:tavieh # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Tra:taviksi # ;

LEXICON VERB_PCP_TÄVÄ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Ela:täväštä # ;!Bible 
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Ess:tävänä # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Gen:tävän # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Nom:tävä # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Par:tävyä # ;!Bible 
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Par+Px3:tävyäh # ;!Bible 
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Tra:täväkši # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Abl:täviltä # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Abl+Px3:täviltäh # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Ade:tävillä # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Ade+Px3:tävilläh # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Com+Px3:tävineh # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Ela:tävistä # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Gen:tävien # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Ill:tävih # ;! CHECKME 20250827 jaska
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Ine:tävissä # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Nom:tävät # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Par:tävie # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Par+Px3:tävieh # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Pl+Tra:täviksi # ;

LEXICON VERB_PCP_N
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+PrfPrc:n # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg+ConNeg:n # ;

LEXICON VERB_PCP_N_BACK
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+PrfPrc:n VERB_CLITS_BACK_OPT ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg+ConNeg:n VERB_CLITS_BACK_OPT ;

LEXICON VERB_PCP_N_FRONT
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Act+PrfPrc:n VERB_CLITS_FRONT_OPT ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg+ConNeg:n VERB_CLITS_FRONT_OPT ;
