src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
ahavoija	verb_intr ;
alkuo	verb_intr ;
ampuo	verb_tr ;
ampuo	verb_intr ;
eleä	verb_intr ;
herkkoinnellakseh	verb_mod ;
herskuttoa	verb_deskr ;
hiivelöitteä	verb_mod ;
hirvistyö	verb_transl ;
hitšissä	verb_deskr ;
hivalkoittoa	verb_mod ;
hoaholie	verb ;
hohkahellakseh	verb_refl ;
hoijattoa	verb_fakt ;
huikaškoittoa	verb_mod ;
hupsoilla	verb_frekv ;
huteroittuo	verb_transl ;
hyntteröitteä	verb_deskr ;
hypälteä	verb_mom ;
häkärrytteä	verb_kaus ;
höm(s)seä	verb_deskr ;
höpsähyö	verb_kontin ;
ispitaija	verb ;
jolkuttoa	verb_deskr ;
juhmevuo	verb_inkoat ;
juimistuo	verb_transl ;
juohtoa	verb_mod ;
jurskata	verb_tr ;
jyräköittyö	verb_transl ;
jätysteä	verb_deskr ;
kaikahtoakseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
kaitristuo	verb_transl ;
kaniutuo	verb_refl ;
kannaltoa	verb_mom ;
karjahella	verb_frekv ;
karkevuttoa	verb_kaus ;
karmeta	verb_transl ;
kasvoa	verb_intr ;
kataitšuttoa	verb_fakt ;
keijoinnellakseh	verb ;
keimahuo	verb_kontin ;
kiikkuillakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
killistyö	verb_pass ;
kimakoittuo	verb_transl ;
kisailehtoa	verb_mod ;
klökörteä	verb_deskr ;
koalattoa	verb_fakt ;
kolissella	verb_frekv ;
kolkahellakseh	verb_refl ;
koristuo	verb_transl ;
korsunoija	verb ;
kouhahuttoa	verb_kaus ;
krimevyö	verb_inkoat ;
kruukitellakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
kulahuo	verb_kontin ;
kulutaltoa	verb_mom ;
kykissytteä	verb_fakt ;
kytteröittyö	verb_transl ;
känttšiekseh	verb_refl ;
käyvä	verb_intr ;
kökšeä	verb_deskr ;
kömähteäkseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
kötšähelläkseh	verb_frekv ;
laihuttoa	verb_kaus ;
lannottautuo	verb_pass ;
laskie	verb_tr ;
lie	verb_vaill ;
liennä	verb_vaill ;
lie(nöy)	verb_vaill ;
livetteä	verb_yksipers ;
lomahellakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
lotravuo	verb_inkoat ;
lukšahtoa	verb ;
lumevuksennella	verb_frekv ;
luokovuo	verb_pass ;
luotuttoa	verb_fakt ;
lykkeälteä	verb_mom ;
lynkistyö	verb_pass.refl ;
löhähteäkseh	verb_refl ;
lökšähyö	verb_kontin ;
moata	verb_intr ;
muisteluttoa	verb_fakt ;
mutškeroituo	verb_pass ;
muutteliutuo	verb_pass.refl ;
myykähteäkseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
mäijöinnelläkseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
mänetytteä	verb_yksipers ;
mäšlissellä	verb_frekv ;
mätšissytteä	verb_kaus ;
nakroa	verb_intr ;
nikahuttoa	verb_yksipers ;
ńovata	verb_deskr ;
nuorata	verb_yksipers ;
näytteä	verb_tr ;
opastoakseh	verb_refl ;
oprautaijakseh	verb_pass.refl ;
osoalla	verb ;
otattoa	verb_fakt ;
painoa	verb_tr ;
paistoa	verb_intr ;
pakaistuo	verb_pass.yksipers ;
palvella	verb_tr ;
patšahtoa	verb_mom ;
pauvahtoakseh	verb_pass.refl ;
pesetteä	verb_fakt.kaus ;
pilmuvuo	verb_pass ;
pisevyö	verb_inkoat ;
piuskahtoakseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
piuskuttoa	verb_kontin ;
pläkätäkseh	verb_pass.refl ;
poatšissellakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
pomeni	verb_vaill ;
poti	verb_vaill ;
potsalui	verb_vaill ;
povoatiutuo	verb_refl ;
puihkaltoakseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
pukšahuttoa	verb_kaus ;
punovuo	verb_pass.refl ;
puurissella	verb_frekv ;
pömähteä	verb_mom ;
raskuttoa	verb_yksipers ;
retesteä	verb ;
riivitteä	verb_fakt ;
riputtoakseh	verb_refl ;
rohistuo	verb_inkoat ;
ruihkahtoakseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
rytjytteä	verb_kontin ;
ryöttäytyö	verb_pass ;
röpišköitteä	verb_kaus ;
rövelläkseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
sankeneltoa	verb_mom ;
sattoakseh	verb_pass.refl ;
šĺoimissuttoa	verb_yksipers ;
šlöhähteäkseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
šlövistyö	verb_inkoat ;
šoahkuttoa	verb_kontin ;
sohrani	verb_vaill ;
stauhkavuo	verb_pass ;
surmoalla	verb ;
šurrutti	verb_vaill ;
šäilähteäkseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
tahkovuttoa	verb_fakt ;
tempailla	verb_frekv ;
terhoinnellakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
toistuo	verb_pass.refl ;
trihkuttoa	verb_kontin ;
tšahravuo	verb_inkoat ;
tšilahtoa	verb_mom ;
tširhisteäkseh	verb_refl ;
tšoimissuttoa	verb_kaus ;
tšupistuo	verb_pass ;
tunkie	verb_tr ;
töllöinnelläkseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
tönkiškätä	verb_inkoat ;
töyskytteä	verb_kontin ;
ukoittoa	verb_yksipers ;
valontuo	verb_pass ;
vassustuo	verb_pass.refl ;
vejätätteä	verb_fakt.kaus ;
veäkälöitteä	verb ;
vipsahtoakseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
viruhtoa	verb_mom ;
voarraškata	verb_inkoat ;
volmissella	verb_frekv ;
votšahuttoa	verb_kaus ;
väntšisselläkseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
vätvissytteä	verb_yksipers ;
